North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 4. Fees.

§ 10B-30.
Imposition and waiver of fees.

For performing a notarial act, a notary may charge up to the maximum fee specified in this Chapter.

A notary shall not discriminatorily condition the fee for a notarial act on any attribute of the principal that would constitute unlawful discrimination.

Nothing in this Chapter shall compel a notary to charge a fee.

A notary may not charge any fee for witnessing and affixing a notarial seal to an absentee ballot application or certificate under

G.S. 163-231

.

History.

2005-391, s. 4; 2013-381, s. 4.7; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification, in consultation with the State Ethics Commission, the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of State, and the new Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “G.S. 163A-1310” for “G.S. 163-231” in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (d).

§ 10B-31.
Fees for notarial acts.

The maximum fees that may be charged by a notary for notarial acts are as follows:

For acknowledgments, jurats, verifications or proofs, five dollars ($5.00) per principal signature.

For oaths or affirmations without a signature, five dollars ($5.00) per person, except for an oath or affirmation administered to a credible witness to vouch for the identity of a principal or subscribing witness.

History.

Code, s. 3749; 1889, c. 446; 1895, c. 296; 1903, c. 734; Rev., s. 2800; C.S., s. 3178; 1973, c. 680, s. 1; 1977, c. 429, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 872; 1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1998-228, s. 6; 2005-328,s. 1; 2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, s. 14.

§ 10B-32.
Notice of fees.

Notaries who charge for their notarial services shall conspicuously display in their places of business, or present to each principal outside their places of business, an English-language schedule of fees for notarial acts. No part of any notarial fee schedule shall be printed in smaller than 10-point type.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-33,
10B-34.

Reserved for future codification purposes.